New York, session 2025-2026, A7259.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 510-e to read as follows: 3 § 510-e. Suspension of registration by the metropolitan transportation 4 authority. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of section 5 five hundred ten of this article, the metropolitan transportation 6 authority is hereby authorized to put on hold or otherwise suspend the 7 registration of a vehicle whose owner has an unpaid balance of toll 8 charges and/or fines in excess of one hundred dollars owed to the 9 authority. Such hold or suspension may remain in effect until all such 10 charges and/or fines are satisfied in full or have been made subject to 11 a payment plan authorized by the authority. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10415-01-5